South Dakota, session 2026, HB1268.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 22-4-1 be AMENDED:
22-4-1. Unless specific provision is made by law, any person who attempts to
commit a crime and, in the attempt, does any act toward the commission of the crime,
but fails or is prevented or intercepted in the perpetration of that crime, is punishable for
the attempt at a maximum sentence of one-half of the penalty prescribed for the
underlying crime. Unless specific provision is made by law, any person who attempts to
commit a Class A, Class B, or Class C felony is guilty of a Class 2 felony.
Section 2. That § 22-4A-1 be AMENDED:
22-4A-1. Any person who, with the intent to promote or facilitate the commission
of a crime, commands, hires, requests, or solicits another person to engage in specific
conduct which that would constitute the commission of such the offense or an attempt to
commit such the offense, is guilty of criminal solicitation.
Criminal solicitation is a:
(1) Class 1 felony if the offense solicited is a Class A, B or C felony;
(2) Class 2 felony if the offense solicited is a Class 1 felony;
(3) Class 3 felony if the offense solicited is a Class 2 felony;
(4) Class 4 felony if the offense solicited is a Class 3 felony;
(5) Class 5 felony if the offense solicited is a Class 4 felony;
(6) Class 6 felony if the offense solicited is a Class 5 felony; or
(7) Class 1 misdemeanor if the offense solicited is a Class 6 felony.
Section 3. That § 22-6-1 be AMENDED:
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.227.17 2 1268
22-6-1. Except as otherwise provided by law, felonies are divided into the following
nine classes, which are distinguished from each other by the following maximum penalties
which that are authorized upon conviction:
(1) Class A felony: death or life imprisonment in a state correctional facility. A lesser
sentence than death or life imprisonment may not be given for a Class A felony. In
addition, a fine of fifty thousand dollars may be imposed;
(2) Class B felony: life imprisonment in a state correctional facility. A lesser sentence
may not be given for a Class B felony. In addition, a fine of fifty thousand dollars
may be imposed;
(3)(2) Class C felony: life imprisonment in a state correctional facility. In addition, a fine
of fifty thousand dollars may be imposed;
(4)(3) Class 1 felony: fifty years imprisonment in a state correctional facility. In addition,
a fine of fifty thousand dollars may be imposed;
(5)(4) Class 2 felony: twenty-five years imprisonment in a state correctional facility. In
addition, a fine of fifty thousand dollars may be imposed;
(6)(5) Class 3 felony: fifteen years imprisonment in a state correctional facility. In
addition, a fine of thirty thousand dollars may be imposed;
(7)(6) Class 4 felony: ten years imprisonment in a state correctional facility. In addition,
a fine of twenty thousand dollars may be imposed;
(8)(7) Class 5 felony: five years imprisonment in a state correctional facility. In addition,
a fine of ten thousand dollars may be imposed; and
(9)(8) Class 6 felony: two years imprisonment in a state correctional facility or a fine of
four thousand dollars, or both.
If the defendant is under the age of eighteen years at the time of the offense and
found guilty of a Class A, B, or C felony, the maximum sentence may be a term of years
in a state correctional facility, and a fine of fifty thousand dollars may be imposed.
The court, in imposing sentence on a defendant who has been found guilty of a
felony, shall order in addition to the sentence that is imposed pursuant to the provisions
of this section, that the defendant make restitution to any victim in accordance with the
provisions of chapter 23A-28.
Nothing in this section limits increased sentences for habitual criminals under
§§ 22-7-7, 22-7-8, and 22-7-8.1.
Section 4. That § 22-16-12 be AMENDED:
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.227.17 3 1268
22-16-12. Murder in the first degree is a Class A felony. Murder in the and second
degree is a Class B felony.
Section 5. That § 23A-10A-15 be AMENDED:
23A-10A-15. If the most serious charge against the defendant is a Class A, B, or
C felony, the order shall must be for a term of years the court determines is reasonable
or until the charges have been dismissed by the prosecution. The order may not exceed
the maximum penalty allowable for the most serious charge facing the defendant. Upon
expiration of the order of detention, the criminal charges against the defendant shall must
be dismissed. If the prosecutor believes there is probable cause to believe that the
defendant is a danger to self or to others at the time of dismissal, the prosecutor may file
a petition in accordance with chapter 27A-10 or 27A-11A or title 27B, for further
restoration to competency.
Every twelve months thereafter, the director of the approved facility shall must
notify the court if the defendant is still in a restoration to competency program under the
direction of an approved facility or in the approved facility pursuant to this chapter, and
the circuit court shall must hold a hearing to review any order of detention to determine
if the defendant has become competent to proceed.
Section 6. That § 23A-20-20 be AMENDED:
23A-20-20. If an offense charged is a Class A, Class B, Class C, or Class 1 felony,
the prosecution and the defense each have twenty peremptory challenges. In all other
felony cases, the prosecution and the defense each have ten peremptory challenges. In
misdemeanor cases, the prosecution and the defense each have three peremptory
challenges.
Section 7. That § 23A-27-1 be AMENDED:
23A-27-1. Sentences shall A sentence must be imposed without unreasonable
delay, but not within forty-eight hours after determination of guilt. A defendant may waive
the forty-eight hour delay. Before imposing a sentence, a court may order a hearing in
mitigation or aggravation of punishment. If the defendant is a juvenile convicted as an
adult of a Class A or Class B felony, prior to imposing a sentence, the court shall must
conduct a presentence hearing. At such the hearing, the court shall allow the defense
counsel an opportunity to speak on behalf of the defendant and shall address the
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.227.17 4 1268
defendant personally and to ask him if he the defendant wishes to make a statement in
his the defendant's own behalf and to present any information in mitigation of punishment.
The prosecuting attorney shall have an equivalent opportunity to speak to the court. The
circumstances must be presented by the testimony of witnesses examined in open court,
except that a witness' deposition of a witness may be taken by a magistrate in accordance
with chapter 23A-12. In imposing a sentence, the court shall enter an order of restitution
in accordance with chapter 23A-28.
Section 8. That § 23A-27A-14 be AMENDED:
23A-27A-14. In the event the death penalty for a Class A felony is held to be
unconstitutional by the South Dakota Supreme Court or the United States Supreme Court,
the court having jurisdiction over a person previously sentenced to death for a Class A
felony shall have such the person brought before the court, and the court shall sentence
such the person to life imprisonment.
Section 9. That § 23A-42-1 be AMENDED:
23A-42-1. There is no limitation on the time within which a prosecution for Class
A, a Class B, or Class C felony must be commenced.
Section 10. That § 26-11-3.1 be AMENDED:
26-11-3.1. Any delinquent child sixteen years of age or older against whom Class
A, a Class B, Class C, Class 1, or Class 2 felony charges have charge has been filed shall
must be tried in circuit court as an adult. However, the The child may request a transfer
hearing which shall be, conducted pursuant to § 26-11-4, to determine if it is in the best
interest of the public that the child be tried in circuit court as an adult. In such a the
transfer hearing, there is a rebuttable presumption that it is in the best interest of the
public that any child, sixteen years of age or older, who is charged with a Class A, Class
B, Class C, Class 1, or Class 2 felony, shall must be tried as an adult.
Section 11. Notwithstanding chapter 23A-27A, a defendant who has been charged with a
crime carrying an authorized punishment of death but who has not yet been convicted and
sentenced to death prior to July 1, 2026, may not be sentenced to death.
Section 12. Nothing in this Act alters, mitigates, or suspends the execution of any death
sentence initially imposed prior to July 1, 2026, regardless of any appellate litigation resulting
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.227.17 5 1268
from the death sentence. Nothing in this Act gives rise to any cause of action to alter, mitigate,
or suspend the execution of any death sentence initially imposed prior to July 1, 2026,
regardless of any appellate litigation resulting from the death sentence.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.